Mississippi, session 2026, SB2923.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  In order to ensure that access to critical health care services will not be eroded or eliminated for residents and nonresidents within the central and eastern regions of the Mississippi Delta, the Division of Medicaid shall not collect or take any steps to collect monies owed due to overpayments received during the 2024 fiscal year from a hospital in Greenwood until after May 1, 2026. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.